District of Columbia statutes.
28-4512

Assurance of discontinuance.

(a)

In enforcing this chapter, the Corporation Counsel may accept an assurance of discontinuance of an act or practice considered in violation of this chapter from any person engaged in the act or practice.

(b)

The assurance of discontinuance shall be in writing and shall be effective only upon the approval of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(c)

The assurance of discontinuance may not be considered for any purpose as an admission of a violation. Proof of failure to comply with the assurance of discontinuance is prima facie evidence of a violation of this chapter.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
1981 Ed., § 28-4512.